District of Columbia statutes.
44-1812

Repealed

Violations.

Repealed.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-99, § 13, 27 DCR 3599
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 22, 39 DCR 9195
1981 Ed., § 32-312.
Severability: Section 21 of D.C. Law 9-197 provided that if any provision of the act is held invalid for any reason, the invalidity shall not effect the other provisions which shall be given effect without the invalid provisions.